Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 8. Inspectors of Lumber; Wiring; Weighers of Coal

§ 1031.
Inspector of lumber, shingles, and wood.

At the request of any party interested, an inspector of lumber, shingles, and wood shall examine and classify the quality of lumber and shingles, measure lumber, shingles, and wood, and give certificates thereof.

§ 1032.
Weigher of coal.

A weigher of coal shall be sworn and shall not be directly or indirectly interested in the sale of coal.
Upon request of the seller or purchaser, he or she shall weigh all coal sold in his or her town.

§ 1033.
Inspector of wiring.

A municipality may authorize the selectboard, mayor and board of aldermen, or trustees to appoint an inspector of electric wiring and fix his or her compensation.